Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2332.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) The seal affixed to the front of the podium in the
chamber of the house of representatives on the effective date of this act is
hereby established as the seal of the house of representatives. Such seal is
described as follows: The east is represented by a rising sun, in the right-
hand corner of the seal; to the left of it, commerce is represented by a river
and a steamboat; in the foreground, agriculture is represented as the basis
of the future prosperity of the state, by a settler's cabin and a man plowing
with a pair of horses; beyond this is a train of ox-wagons, going west; in
the background is seen a herd of buffalo, retreating, pursued by two
Indians, on horseback; around the top is the motto, "Ad astra per aspera,"
and beneath a cluster of thirty-four stars. The circle is surrounded by the
words, "Kansas House of Representatives".
(b) The seal of the house of representatives shall be kept in the office
of the speaker of the house of representatives and used in attestation of
official documents of the house of representatives and for such other
purposes as approved by the speaker.
(c) The house of representatives seal may be used by any member
of the house of representatives on any official stationery, newsletter or
other official communication or for any personal use, except that, such
use shall not convey an official position of the house of representatives.
(d) The house of representatives seal shall not be used for any
campaign purposes.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.